District of Columbia statutes.
25-803

Search warrants for illegal alcoholic beverages; disposition of seized beverages.

If a search warrant is issued by any judge of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia or by a United States Magistrate for the District of Columbia for premises where any alcoholic beverages are manufactured for sale, kept for sale, sold, or consumed in violation of this title, the alcoholic beverages and any other property designed for use in connection with the unlawful manufacture for sale, keeping for sale, selling, or consumption may be seized and shall be subject to such disposition as the court may make thereof.

Jan. 24, 1934, 48 Stat. 334, ch. 4, § 29
Apr. 1, 1942, 56 Stat. 190, ch. 207, § 1
June 29, 1953, 67 Stat. 104, ch. 159, § 404(i)
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a)
May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959
This section is referenced in § 25-911.
1981 Ed., § 25-803.
1973 Ed., § 25-129.